District of Columbia statutes.
7-1721.07

Civil penalties.

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of §§ 7-1721.02, 7-1721.04, 7-1721.05, and 7-1721.06, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter for these sections, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.]. Adjudication of any infraction of these sections shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

Feb. 7, 1891, 26 Stat. 736, ch. 117, § 8
as added July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-189, § 3(d), 57 DCR 3019